test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ING_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲íng - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ING_STEM_2

     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲éengaa
     k̲íng+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲éengaan
     k̲íng+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲éengaas
     k̲íng+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲éengaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲éeng'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲éeng'ahlanggan
     k̲íng+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲éeng'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íng+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲éeng'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲éengaa'ahlang
     k̲íng+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲éengaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íng+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲éengaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲éeng'ahl
